Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 1
STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

Section.

33-101. Creation of board.

For the general supervision, governance and control of all state educational institutions, to wit: University of Idaho, Idaho State University, Boise State University, Lewis-Clark State College, the School for the Deaf and the Blind and any other state educational institution which may hereafter be founded, and for the general supervision, governance and control of the public school systems, including public community colleges, a state board of education is created. The said board shall be known as the state board of education and board of regents of the University of Idaho.

For the purposes of section 20, article IV, of the constitution of the state of Idaho, the state board of education and all of its offices, agencies, divisions and departments shall be an executive department of state government.

Where the term “state board” shall hereafter appear, it shall mean the state board of education and board of regents of the University of Idaho.

33-102. Membership — Appointment — Term of office — Qualifications — Place of office.

The state board of education shall consist of the state superintendent of public instruction, who shall be an ex officio voting member and who shall serve as executive secretary of the board for all elementary and secondary school matters, and seven (7) members appointed by the governor, each for a term of five (5) years. Annually on the first day of July the governor shall appoint members to fill the board positions for which the terms of office have expired. Upon the expiration date of the term of office, a member shall continue to serve until a successor shall have been appointed. The governor shall, by appointment, fill any vacancy on the board, such appointment to be for the unexpired term of the retiring member. Appointment to the board shall be made solely upon consideration of the ability of such appointees efficiently to serve the interests of the people, and education, without reference to locality, occupation, party affiliation or religion. Any person appointed to said board shall have been a resident of the state for not less than three (3) years prior to the date of appointment; and shall qualify and assume the duties in accordance with laws governing similar appointments to, and qualifications for, office on other state boards. Members shall act and assume full powers and duties upon appointment, but such appointments shall be subject to confirmation by the senate at its next regular session.

The state board shall have and maintain its office in Ada county.

33-102A. Office of the state board — Executive officer — Appointment — Compensation — Duties and powers.

There is hereby created as an executive agency of the state board of education the office of the state board of education. The state board of education is hereby authorized to appoint an executive officer of the state board who shall serve at the pleasure of the state board and shall receive such salary as fixed by the state board. The executive secretary may be appointed as the executive officer. The executive officer shall, under the direction of the state board, have such duties and powers as prescribed by the said board of regents and the state board of education, not otherwise assigned by law.

33-102B. Superintendent of Public Instruction — Appointment — Compensation

Duties and Powers. [Repealed.]

33-103. Removal of members — Cause.

The governor is empowered to remove from membership on the state board any member who has been proved guilty of gross immorality, malfeasance in office or incompetency, and shall fill the vacancy thus created by appointment as hereinbefore provided.

33-104. Meetings of the board — Honorarium — Expenses — Organization.

The state board shall hold no less than four (4) regular meetings annually at such time and place as may be directed by the board. Special meetings may be called by the president at any time and place designated in such call.

Each member shall be compensated as provided by section 59-509(h), Idaho Code.

At its first meeting after the first day of April, in each year, the state board shall organize and shall elect from its membership a president, a vice president and a secretary.

33-105. Rules — Executive department.

The state board shall have power to make rules for its own government and the government of its executive departments and offices; and, upon recommendations of its executive officers, to appoint to said departments and offices such specialists, clerks and other employees as the execution of duties may require, to fix their salaries and assign their duties.

Statements of the state board of education and board of regents of the university of Idaho which relate to the curriculum of public educational institutions, to students attending or applicants to such institutions, or to the use and maintenance of land, equipment and buildings controlled by the respective institutions, are not rules and are not statements of general applicability for the purposes of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

Notwithstanding any other provision of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, the state board of education and board of regents of the university of Idaho shall be deemed to be in full compliance with the notice requirements of section 67-5221, Idaho Code, if:

Notice is given by including the intended action in the official written agenda for a regularly scheduled meeting of the board, and the agenda is available for public inspection at the central office of the board not less than five (5) days prior to the meeting; and

Notice of the intended action, accompanied by the full text of the rule under consideration prepared so as to indicate words added or deleted from the presently effective text, if any, is transmitted to the director of the legislative services office at the same time that notice is given under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The director of the legislative services office shall refer the material under consideration to the germane joint subcommittee created in section 67-454, Idaho Code, to afford the subcommittee opportunity to submit data, views or arguments in writing to the board prior to the time for receiving comment as provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection; and

The intended action is discussed but not acted upon during the regularly scheduled meeting for which the agenda was prepared, but instead is held for final action at the next regularly scheduled or later meeting of the board; and

At least fifteen (15) days prior to the scheduled date for final action, the board shall mail to all persons who have made timely request in writing to the board and shall publish in an issue of the Idaho administrative bulletin a brief description of the intended action, or a concise summary of any statement of economic impact required pursuant to section 67-5223(2), Idaho Code, and shall note the time when, the place where, and the manner in which interested persons may present their views thereon; and

Upon adoption of a rule, the board, if requested in writing to do so by an interested person either prior to adoption or within twenty-eight (28) days thereafter, shall issue a concise statement of the principal reasons for and against its adoption, incorporating therein its reasons for overruling the considerations urged against its adoption.

33-106. Budget.

The state board shall prepare a budget of necessary expenditures of its executive department, and shall have control of all moneys appropriated for said purposes.

33-107. General powers and duties of the state board.

The state board shall have power to:

Perform all duties prescribed for it by the school laws of the state;

Acquire, hold and dispose of title, rights and interests in real and personal property;

Have general supervision, through its executive departments and offices, of all entities of public education supported in whole or in part by state funds;

Delegate to its executive secretary, to its executive officer, or to such other administrators as the board may appoint, such powers as said officers require to carry out and administer the policies, orders and directives of the board;
(4)(a) Delegate to its executive secretary, to its executive officer, or to such other administrators as the board may appoint, such powers as said officers require to carry out and administer the policies, orders and directives of the board;

Delegate to its executive officer, if necessary to enhance effectiveness and efficiency, such powers as he requires to exercise discretionary authority and to perform duties vested in the state board related to the operation, control and management of Idaho’s state universities and colleges and other agencies under the supervision and governance of the state board, and to perform duties and render decisions prescribed to the state board involving the exercise of judgment and discretion that affect the public schools in Idaho;

Delegate to the presidents of Idaho’s state universities and colleges, if necessary to enhance effectiveness and efficiency, such powers as said officers require to exercise discretionary authority and to perform duties vested in the state board related to the operation, control and management of Idaho’s state universities and colleges;

Delegate to its executive secretary, the superintendent of public instruction, if necessary to enhance effectiveness and efficiency, such powers as he requires to perform duties and render decisions prescribed to the state board involving the exercise of judgment and discretion that affect the public schools in Idaho;

Delegations of powers under this subsection must be adopted as statements of agency action by the state board, as provided in section 33-105(2), Idaho Code, and pursuant to a process that provides for notice, opportunity for input and formal adoption by the state board;

Through its executive departments and offices:

Enforce the school laws of the state,

Study the educational conditions and needs of the state and recommend to the legislature needed changes in existing laws or additional legislation;

In addition to the powers conferred by chapter 24, title 33, Idaho Code:

Maintain a register of postsecondary educational institutions approved to provide programs and courses that lead to a degree or which provide, offer and sell degrees in accordance with the procedures established in chapter 24, title 33, Idaho Code,

Determine whether to accept academic credit at public postsecondary educational institutions in Idaho. Academic credit shall not be transferred into any Idaho public postsecondary institution from a postsecondary educational institution or other entity that is not accredited by an organization recognized by the board,

Maintain a register of proprietary schools approved to conduct, provide, offer or sell a course or courses of study in accordance with the procedures established in chapter 24, title 33, Idaho Code;

Prescribe the courses and programs of study to be offered at the public institutions of higher education, after consultation with the presidents of the affected institutions;
(8) Approve new courses and programs of study to be offered at community colleges organized pursuant to chapter 21, title 33, Idaho Code, when the courses or programs of study are academic in nature and the credits derived therefrom are intended to be transferable to other state institutions of higher education for credit toward a baccalaureate degree, and when the courses or programs of study have been authorized by the board of trustees of the community college.

33-107A. Board may establish an optional retirement program.

The state board of education may establish an optional retirement program under which contracts providing retirement and death benefits may be purchased for members of the teaching staff and officers of the university of Idaho, Idaho state university, Boise state university, Lewis-Clark state college and the state board of education who are hired on or after July 1, 1993; provided, however, that no such employee shall be eligible to participate in an optional retirement program unless he would otherwise be eligible for membership in the public employee retirement system of Idaho.

The state board of education is hereby authorized to provide for the administration of the optional retirement program and to perform or authorize the performance of such functions as may be necessary for such purposes. The board shall designate the company or companies from which contracts are to be purchased under the optional retirement program and shall approve the form and contents of such contracts. In making the designation and giving approval, the board shall consider:

The nature and extent of the rights and benefits to be provided by such contracts for participants and their beneficiaries;

The relation of such rights and benefits to the amount of contributions to be made;

The suitability of such rights and benefits to the needs of the participants and the interests of the institutions in the recruitment and retention of staff members; and

The ability of the designated company to provide such suitable rights and benefits under such contracts.

Elections to participate in an optional retirement program shall be as follows:

Eligible employees are:

Those faculty and nonclassified staff initially appointed or hired between July 1, 1990, and June 30, 1993; and

Those teaching staff and officers initially appointed or hired on or after July 1, 1993.

To the public employee retirement system, an amount equal to one and forty-nine hundredths percent (1.49%) of salaries of members who are participants in the optional retirement program. This amount shall be paid until July 1, 2025, and is in lieu of amortization payments and withdrawal contributions required pursuant to chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code.

Vested members of the public employee retirement system of Idaho may make a one (1) time irrevocable election to remain a member of that retirement system. The election shall be made in writing, within sixty (60) days of the date of initial hire or appointment or the effective date of this act, whichever occurs later. It shall be filed with the administrative officer of the employing institution.

An election by an eligible employee of the optional retirement program shall be irrevocable and shall be accompanied by an appropriate application, where required, for issuance of a contract or contracts under the program.

The accumulated contributions of employees who make the one (1) time irrevocable election or are required to participate in the optional retirement program may be transferred by the public employee retirement system of Idaho to such qualified plan, maintained under the optional retirement program, as designated in writing by the employee.

Each institution shall contribute on behalf of each participant in its optional retirement program the following:
(i) To the designated company or companies, an amount equal to nine and thirty-five hundredths percent (9.35%) of each participant’s salary, reduced by any amount necessary, if any, to provide contributions to a total disability program provided either by the state or by a private insurance carrier licensed and authorized to provide such benefits or any combination thereof, but in no event less than five percent (5%) of each participant’s salary; and
(4)(a) Each institution shall contribute on behalf of each participant in its optional retirement program the following:
(i) To the designated company or companies, an amount equal to nine and thirty-five hundredths percent (9.35%) of each participant’s salary, reduced by any amount necessary, if any, to provide contributions to a total disability program provided either by the state or by a private insurance carrier licensed and authorized to provide such benefits or any combination thereof, but in no event less than five percent (5%) of each participant’s salary; and

Each participant shall contribute an amount equal to six and ninety-seven hundredths percent (6.97%) of the participant’s salary. Employee contributions may be made by employer pick-up pursuant to section 59-1332, Idaho Code.

Payment of contributions authorized or required under this subsection shall be made by the financial officer of the employing institution to the designated company or companies for the benefits of each participant.

Any person participating in the optional retirement program shall be ineligible for membership in the public employee retirement system of Idaho as long as he remains continuously employed in any teaching staff position or as an officer with any of the institutions under the jurisdiction of the state board of education.

A retirement, death or other benefit shall not be paid by the state of Idaho or the state board of education for services credited under the optional retirement program. Such benefits are payable to participants or their beneficiaries only by the designated company or companies in accordance with the terms of the contracts.

All eligible employees, except those who are vested members of the public employee retirement system of Idaho, shall participate in the optional retirement program.

33-107B. Board may establish an optional retirement program for community colleges.

The state board of education may establish an optional retirement program under which contracts providing retirement and death benefits may be purchased for members of the teaching staff and officers of community colleges, including north Idaho college, college of southern Idaho and college of eastern Idaho, hired on or after July 1, 1997; provided however, that no such employee shall be eligible to participate in an optional retirement program unless he would otherwise be eligible for membership in the public employee retirement system of Idaho.

The state board of education is hereby authorized to provide for the administration of the optional retirement program and to perform or authorize the performance of such functions as may be necessary for such purposes. The board shall designate the company or companies from which contracts are to be purchased under the optional retirement program and shall approve the form and contents of such contracts. In making the designation and giving approval, the board shall consider:

The nature and extent of the rights and benefits to be provided by such contracts for participants and their beneficiaries;

The relation of such rights and benefits to the amount of contributions to be made;

The suitability of such rights and benefits to the needs of the participants and the interests of the institutions in the recruitment and retention of staff members; and

The ability of the designated company to provide such suitable rights and benefits under such contracts.

Elections to participate in an optional retirement program shall be as follows:

Eligible employees are the teaching staff and officers initially appointed or hired on or after the effective date of this chapter. All eligible employees, except those who are vested members of the public employee retirement system of Idaho, shall participate in the optional retirement program.

Eligible employees who are vested members of the public employee retirement system of Idaho may make a one (1) time irrevocable election to transfer to the optional retirement program. The election shall be made in writing and within sixty (60) days of the date of initial hire or appointment, or one hundred fifty (150) days after the effective date of this chapter, whichever occurs later. The election shall be filed with the administrative officer of the employing institution. The election shall be effective not later than the first day of the second pay period following the date of the election.

Teaching staff and officers employed by the institution the day before the effective date of this chapter may make a one (1) time irrevocable election to participate in the optional retirement program. The election shall be made in writing and within one hundred fifty (150) days after the effective date of this chapter. The election shall be filed with the administrative officer of the employing institution. The election shall be effective not later than the first day of the second pay period following the date of the election.

The accumulated contributions of employees who make the one (1) time irrevocable election or are required to participate in the optional retirement program may be transferred by the public employee retirement system of Idaho to such qualified plan, maintained under the optional retirement program, as designated in writing by the employee.
(e) An election by an eligible employee of the optional retirement program shall be irrevocable and shall be accompanied by an appropriate application, where required, for issuance of a contract or contracts under the program.

Each institution shall contribute on behalf of each participant in its optional retirement program. Effective on and after July 1, 2011, the institutional contribution optional retirement program rate shall be equal to the public employee retirement system of Idaho contribution rates to the designated company or companies, reduced by the amount necessary, if any, to provide contributions to a total disability program provided either by the state or by a private insurance carrier licensed and authorized to provide such benefits, or any combination thereof, but in no event less than five percent (5%) of each participant’s salary.
(4)(a) Each institution shall contribute on behalf of each participant in its optional retirement program. Effective on and after July 1, 2011, the institutional contribution optional retirement program rate shall be equal to the public employee retirement system of Idaho contribution rates to the designated company or companies, reduced by the amount necessary, if any, to provide contributions to a total disability program provided either by the state or by a private insurance carrier licensed and authorized to provide such benefits, or any combination thereof, but in no event less than five percent (5%) of each participant’s salary.

For the purposes of section 59-1322, Idaho Code, the term “projected salaries” shall include the sum of the annual salaries of all participants in the optional retirement program established pursuant to this section.

Each participant shall contribute an amount equal to six and ninety-seven hundredths percent (6.97%). Employee contributions may be made by employer pick-up pursuant to section 59-1332, Idaho Code.

Any person participating in the optional retirement program shall be ineligible for membership in the public employee retirement system of Idaho as long as he remains continuously employed in any teaching staff position or as an officer with any of the institutions under the jurisdiction of the state board of education.

A retirement, death or other benefit shall not be paid by the state of Idaho or the state board of education for services credited under the optional retirement program. Such benefits are payable to participants or their beneficiaries only by the designated company or companies in accordance with the terms of the contracts.

33-107C. Board may establish additional retirement plans.

The state board of education and the board of regents of the university of Idaho may establish one (1) or more retirement plans as described herein for members of the teaching staff and officers of the university of Idaho, Idaho state university, Boise state university, Lewis-Clark state college and the state board of education who are eligible to participate in an optional retirement program described in section 33-107A, Idaho Code, or section 33-107B, Idaho Code, or who are vested members in the public employee retirement system of Idaho.

A plan established under this section shall comply with federal tax laws applicable to the design of the plan, which may include sections 401(a), 403(b), 415(m), 457(b) and 457(f) of the Internal Revenue Code or other federal tax laws.

To the extent permitted by federal tax law, a plan established under this section may provide for contributions or payments solely at the direction of the employer, or deferral of an employee’s compensation at the election of the employee.

33-107D. Campus access for religious students.

No state postsecondary educational institution shall take any action or enforce any policy that would deny a religious student group any benefit available to any other student group based on the religious student group’s requirement that its leaders adhere to its sincerely held religious beliefs or standards of conduct.

As used in this section:

“Benefits” include without limitation:

Recognition;

Registration;

The use of facilities at the state postsecondary educational institution for meetings or speaking purposes;

The use of channels of communication of the state postsecondary educational institution; and

Funding sources that are otherwise available to any other student group through the state postsecondary educational institution.

“State postsecondary educational institution” means a public postsecondary organization governed or supervised by the state board, the board of regents of the university of Idaho, a board of trustees of a community college established pursuant to the provisions of chapter 21, title 33, Idaho Code, or the state board for career technical education.

33-108. Prepare and publish reports.

The state board shall prepare, or cause to be prepared, and publish such reports, statistical tables and studies as may be a contribution to the general educational welfare of the state.

33-109. Annual report.

The state board shall cause to be prepared a report of its actions and expenditures for each year ending on the thirtieth day of June with such recommendations as it shall deem proper for the good of the state educational institutions and public schools of the state. Such report shall be prepared in the form and number, and filed at the time, provided by section 67-3502, Idaho Code.

33-110. Agency to negotiate, and accept, federal assistance.

The state board is designated as the state educational agency which is authorized to negotiate, and contract with, the federal government, and to accept financial or other assistance from the federal government or any agency thereof, under such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by congressional enactment designed to further the cause of education.

33-111. Budget for educational institutions.

The state board shall submit to the budget director of the state, at a time set by said director, a budget for each state educational institution under its government and control, showing the financial needs of said institutions for the period for which appropriations are to be made. The board shall direct and control all funds so appropriated.

33-112. Plans and specifications — Equipment, appliances and supplies.

The state board shall authorize and approve all plans and specifications for the construction or alteration of buildings at the state educational institutions under its government and control; and shall direct and control the purchase of equipment, fixtures and supplies therefor.

33-113. Limits of instruction.

The state board, in the interests of efficiency, shall define the limits of all instruction in the educational institutions supported in whole or in part by the state, and, as far as practicable, prevent wasteful duplication of effort in said institutions.

33-114. Certification — Courses of study — Accreditation.

Supervision and control of the certification of professional education personnel is vested in the state board. The board shall approve the program of education of such personnel in all higher institutions in the state, both public and private, and shall accredit as teacher training institutions those in which such programs have been approved.

33-115. Teachers’ register.

The state board shall keep in its department of education, a register of persons qualified to teach in Idaho, or of any persons otherwise qualified but not having received a teaching certificate, upon the request of such person. Information concerning persons so registered shall be available to any Idaho person seeking to employ teachers.

33-116. School districts under board supervision.

All school districts in Idaho, including specially chartered school districts, shall be under the supervision and control of the state board.

33-117. Public school financial requirements.

The state board shall submit to the budget director the financial requirements for appropriation to the public school income fund, for the foundation program of public school districts.

33-118. Courses of study — Curricular materials.

The state board shall prescribe the minimum courses to be taught in all public elementary and secondary schools, and shall cause to be prepared and issued, such syllabi, study guides and other instructional aids as the board shall from time to time deem necessary.

The board shall determine how and under what rules curricular materials shall be adopted for the public schools, including the fees necessary to defray the cost of such adoption process. The board shall require all publishers of textbooks approved for use to furnish the department of education with electronic format for literary and nonliterary subjects when electronic formats become available for nonliterary subjects, in a standard format approved by the board, from which reproductions can be made for use by the blind.

The board shall, by rule, determine the process by which the department of education reviews and approves online courses, pursuant to section 33-1024, Idaho Code, and the fees necessary to defray the department’s cost of such review and approval process.

The board of trustees of each school district may adopt their own curricular materials consistent with the provisions of section 33-512A, Idaho Code. Curricular materials adopted must be consistent with Idaho content standards as established by the state board of education.

33-118A. Curricular materials — Adoption procedures.

All curricular materials adoption committees appointed by the state board of education shall contain at least two (2) persons who are not public educators or school trustees. All meetings of curricular materials adoption committees shall be open to the public. Any member of the public may attend such meetings and file written or make oral objections to any curricular materials under consideration.

“Curricular materials” is defined as textbook and instructional media including software, audio/visual media and internet resources.

33-119. Accreditation of secondary schools — Standards for elementary schools.

The state board shall establish standards for accreditation of any secondary school and set forth minimum requirements to be met by public, private and parochial secondary schools, and those in chartered school districts, for accredited status; and the board may establish such standards for all public elementary schools as it may deem necessary.

The board may withdraw accreditation from any secondary school after such period as it may establish when it has been determined that such school has failed or neglected to conform to accreditation standards; and it may reinstate such school as accredited when in its judgment such school has again qualified for accredited status. The board may further establish minimum requirements which any pupil shall meet to qualify for graduation from an accredited secondary school.

“Secondary school” for the purposes of this section shall mean a school which, for operational purposes, is organized and administered on the basis of grades seven (7) through twelve (12), inclusive, or any combination thereof.

“Elementary school” for the purposes of this section shall mean a school which, for operational purposes, is organized and administered on the basis of grades one (1) through six (6), inclusive, one (1) through eight (8), inclusive, or any combination of grades one (1) through eight (8), inclusive.

33-120. Uniform reporting.

The state superintendent of public instruction shall prescribe forms and format for uniform accounting for financial and statistical reports and performance measurements to provide consistent and uniform reporting by school districts.

The state board of education may adopt rules pursuant to the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, and under authority of section 33-105, Idaho Code, to provide for and implement a student information management system.

33-120A. Idaho student information management system. [Repealed.]

33-121. Examination of books at instance of the state board.

Whenever in its judgment the public welfare demands it, the state board may direct the trustees of any school district to cause an examination of the books and accounts, and the assets and liabilities of their district, to be made, and a report thereof to be made to the state board. Upon failure or neglect of the board of trustees to have such examination and report made within a reasonable time, the state board may cause the same to be made, and the cost of such examination and report shall be paid by the district.

33-122. Sanitation — Safety — Cooperation with other state agencies.

The state board shall cooperate with the board of health and welfare in establishing regulations covering school building sanitation, sewage disposal, water supply, or other matters affecting the public health, as shall in the opinion of the board be required. It may cooperate with any other department of state government in any matter in which such cooperation will be of assistance in carrying out its duties.

Whenever the state board has reason to believe that any building used as a school building is so structurally unsafe, unsound, or deficient, as to constitute a hazard to the pupils attending thereat, it shall have authority to cause an examination of such building to be made by a competent engineer. The engineer making such examination shall report, in writing, to the state board, setting out in what respect such building is unsafe, unsound, or deficient, as aforesaid.

The state board shall transmit a copy of such report to the board of trustees of the school district wherein such building is situate, or to the governing body of any such school if it not be a public school, and the same shall be kept in the administrative office of such school district, or school, there to be available for public inspection. The state board shall also order and cause to be published a summary of such engineer’s report in at least one (1) issue of a newspaper having general circulation in the same school district, or in the area of the same school if it not be a public school.

33-123. Education for inmates under jurisdiction of department of correction.

The state board for career technical education, in cooperation with the state board of correction, shall have prepared suitable courses of study, including career technical training, for prisoners held under the jurisdiction of the department of correction, and the state board of correction shall make arrangements carrying into effect all provisions for the education of prisoners who are under the jurisdiction of the department of correction to the extent possible within the limits of moneys appropriated by the state legislature. Such educational opportunities shall be limited to those inmates who have a need, such need to be determined by the staff of the department of correction, and can benefit from training, and those inmates whose degree of custody classification allows participation in the classroom environment provided.

33-124. Special vocational education programs.

Any school district, or combination of school districts, within the state of Idaho, including charter districts, may submit to the state board of education a plan for the operation of a program providing instruction and training for students with disabilities under the age of twenty-two (22) years in vocational education. The state board of education may approve or disapprove such a plan. However, should the state board approve such a plan, then the program operated under such a plan shall be entitled to all considerations and benefits which by law are available to the educational programs of the school districts.

33-125. State department of education — Creation — Duties.

There is hereby established as an executive agency of the state board of education a department known as the state department of education. The state superintendent shall serve as the executive officer of such department and shall have the responsibility for carrying out policies, procedures and duties authorized by law or established by the state board of education for all elementary and secondary school matters, and to administer grants for the promotion of science education as provided in sections 33-128 and 33-129, Idaho Code.

33-125A. Duties of the state superintendent of public instruction and the state department of education.

Under the direction of the state superintendent of public instruction, the state department of education shall:

Coordinate with the Idaho digital learning academy as provided for in chapter 55, title 33, Idaho Code, the state board of education and school districts to distribute telecourses, teleconferences and other instructional and training services to and between public schools;

Coordinate with the Idaho digital learning academy, the state board of education and institutions of higher education to distribute college credit telecourses, teleconferences and other instructional and training services; and

Act as a clearinghouse for the materials, courses, publications and other applicable information related to the requirements of this section.